Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 15 MINED LAND RECLAMATION
§ 47-1512. Financial assurance — Requisites.

Prior to conducting any mining operations on a mine panel covered by an approved reclamation plan or operating a cyanidation facility covered by an approved permanent closure plan, an operator shall submit to the board financial assurance meeting the requirements of this section.

The initial reclamation financial assurance filed prior to conducting any mining operations on a mine panel shall be in an amount determined by the board to be the estimated reasonable costs of reclamation required in this chapter, in the event of failure to reclaim by an operator, of affected lands proposed to be mined during the next calendar year designated by the operator pursuant to section 47-1506(a)(1)(vi), Idaho Code, and subsection (b) of this section.

The initial permanent closure financial assurance filed prior to operating a cyanidation facility shall be in an amount determined by the board to be the estimated reasonable costs to complete the activities specified in the permanent closure plan required in this chapter, in the event of the failure of an operator to complete those activities. In setting such amount, the board shall avoid duplication with financial assurance deposited with other governmental agencies.

The determination of the financial assurance amount shall constitute a final order subject to judicial review as set forth in subsection (a) of section 47-1514, Idaho Code. In lieu of any financial assurance required hereunder, the operator may deposit cash and governmental securities with the board, in an amount equal to that of the required financial assurance, on the conditions as prescribed in this section.

Prior to the time that lands designated to become affected lands on a mine panel, in addition to those designated pursuant to section 47-1506(a)(1)(vi), Idaho Code, become affected land, the operator shall submit to the board financial assurance meeting the requirements of section 47-1512(c), Idaho Code, which shall be in the amount necessary to ensure the performance of the duties of the operator under this chapter as to such affected lands actually proposed to be mined within the next calendar year. If additional acreage is subsequently proposed to be mined by an operator, financial assurance shall be in an amount determined by the board to be the estimated reasonable costs of reclamation required by this chapter, in the event of failure to reclaim by an operator, of affected lands proposed to be mined during the next calendar year.

For mining operations with affected land greater than five (5) acres, the financial assurance amount shall be based on the estimated reasonable costs of completing reclamation required in this chapter using standard estimating techniques, including indirect costs, developed by the board. For all other mining operations, the financial assurance for reclamation submitted pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for any given acre of such affected land. The board may require financial assurance in excess of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for any given acre of affected land only when the following conditions have been met:

The board has determined that such financial assurance is necessary to meet the requirements of sections 47-1506, 47-1509, 47-1510 and 47-1511, Idaho Code.

The board has delivered to the operator, in writing, a notice setting forth the reasons it believes such financial assurance is necessary.
(3) The board has conducted a hearing where the operator is allowed to give testimony to the board concerning the amount of the proposed financial assurance. The hearing shall be held under such rules as promulgated by the board. This requirement for a hearing may be waived, in writing, by the operator. Any hearing held shall, at the discretion of the director, extend the time, up to thirty (30) days, in which the board must act on a plan submitted.

For a cyanidation facility with affected land greater than five (5) acres, the financial assurance amount shall be based on the estimated reasonable costs to complete reclamation required under this chapter using standard estimating techniques, including indirect costs, developed by the board. For all other cyanidation facilities, the financial assurance submitted for permanent closure of a cyanidation facility pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The board may require financial assurance in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for a cyanidation facility only when the following conditions have been met:

The board has determined that such financial assurance is necessary to meet the requirements of this chapter.

The board has delivered to the operator, in writing, a notice setting forth the reasons it believes such financial assurance is necessary.

The board has conducted a hearing where the operator is allowed to give testimony to the board concerning the amount of the proposed financial assurance. The hearing shall be held under such rules as promulgated by the board. This requirement for a hearing may be waived, in writing, by the operator. Any hearing held shall, at the discretion of the director, extend the time, up to sixty (60) days, in which the board must act on the permanent closure plan submitted.

Any financial assurance required under this chapter to be filed and maintained with the board shall be in such form as the board prescribes, payable to the state of Idaho, conditioned that the operator shall faithfully perform all requirements of this chapter and comply with all rules of the board in effect as of the date of approval of the plan in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Further, any financial assurance provided to another governmental agency that also meets the requirements in this section shall be deemed to be sufficient for the purposes of this chapter.

Financial assurance filed as prescribed in this section shall not be canceled, except after not less than ninety (90) days’ notice to the board. Upon failure of the operator to make substitution of financial assurance prior to the effective date of cancellation of the financial assurance or within thirty (30) days following notice of cancellation by the board, whichever is later, the board shall have the right to issue a cease and desist order and seek injunctive relief to stop the operator from conducting operations covered by such financial assurance until such substitution has been made.

If the license to do business in this state of any surety, upon a bond filed with the board pursuant to this chapter, shall be suspended or revoked, the operator, within thirty (30) days after receiving notice thereof from the board, shall substitute for such surety alternative financial assurance in accordance with this section. Upon failure of the operator to make substitution of financial assurance, the board shall have the right to issue a cease and desist order and seek injunctive relief to stop the operator from conducting operations covered by such financial assurance until such substitution has been made.

When an operator shall have completed all or a portion of reclamation requirements, or all or a portion of any post-closure activity, under the provisions of this chapter as to any portion of affected land or any post-closure activity, he may notify the board. Within thirty (30) days after the receipt of such notice, the board shall notify the operator as to whether or not the reclamation or post-closure activity performed meets the requirements of the reclamation plan pertaining to the land in question.
(1) Upon the determination by the board that the requirements of the reclamation plan in question have been substantially met as to said lands or such activity, the amount of financial assurance in effect as to such lands or such activity shall be reduced by an amount designated by the board to reflect the reclamation done.

When an operator shall have completed an activity specified in an approved permanent closure plan, he may notify the board. Within thirty (30) days after the receipt of such notice, the board shall notify the operator as to whether or not the activity performed meets the requirements of the permanent closure plan. In determining whether or not an activity under the statutory responsibility of the department of environmental quality meets the requirements of the permanent closure plan, the board shall consult with that department.

Upon the determination by the board that the activity meets the requirements of the permanent closure plan, the financial assurance for permanent closure shall be reduced by an amount designated by the board to reflect the activity completed.

Upon a determination by the board that the requirements of the permanent closure plan in question have not been met as to said lands, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of the request for financial assurance release and shall set forth in said notice the reasons for such rejection, the factual findings upon which such rejection is based, the manner in which the activity fails to fulfill the requirements of the permanent closure plan, and the changes necessary to comply with the requirements of the permanent closure plan.

An operator may withdraw any land previously designated as affected land within a mine panel, provided that it is not already affected land, and in such event, he shall notify the board, and the amount of the bond in effect as to the lands in that mine panel shall be reduced by an amount designated by the board as the amount which would have been necessary to reclaim such lands.

Proof of financial assurance may be demonstrated by surety bond, corporate guarantee, letter of credit, certificate of deposit, trust fund, and any combination thereof or any other proof of financial assurance approved by the board.

An operator may provide proof of financial assurance by use of a trust fund, provided the following conditions are met:

The trust fund is managed by a third-party trustee;

The trust fund names the state of Idaho as beneficiary; and

The trust is initially funded in an amount at least equal to:

The financial assurance amount as estimated by this section;

A specified schedule of payments into the fund; or

A pro-rata amount if used with another financial assurance mechanism.

The trustee shall invest the principal and income of the fund in accordance with general investment practices. Investments can include equities, bonds, and government securities.

The operator enters into a memorandum of agreement with the board that identifies the trustee, a range of investments, initial funding, schedule of payments, and expected rate of return.

The trust fund balance shall be reviewed by the board at a period not to exceed once every five (5) years and adjustments to the trust fund made to meet the conditions of the agreement and this chapter.

Following the permanent cessation of a mining operation, the board may determine that a post-closure period of greater than thirty (30) years is necessary only when the following conditions have been met:

The board has determined that such longer post-closure period is necessary to meet the requirements of sections 47-1506, 47-1509, 47-1510, and 47-1511, Idaho Code;

The board has delivered to the operator, in writing, a notice setting forth the reasons it believes a longer post-closure period is necessary;

The board has conducted a hearing where the operator is allowed to give testimony concerning the length of the post-closure period. The hearing shall be held under such rules as promulgated by the board. The requirement for a hearing may be waived by the operator; and

Any decision by the board under this subsection shall be considered a final order pursuant to section 47-1514, Idaho Code.

Any mining operation that is addressing water management, and any releases to the environment through a comprehensive environmental response, compensation and liability act (CERCLA) order, including any required financial assurance, shall not be required to submit financial assurance to the board for any activities covered by a CERCLA order.

(2) Upon a determination by the board that the requirements of the reclamation plan in question have not been substantially met as to said lands or such activity, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of the request for financial assurance release and shall set forth in said notice the reasons for such rejection, the factual findings upon which such rejection is based, the manner in which the reclamation fails to fulfill the requirements of the reclamation plan, and the changes necessary to comply with the requirements of the reclamation plan.

§ 47-1513. Operator’s failure to comply — Forfeiture of financial assurance — Penalties — Reclamation fund — Cyanidation closure fund.

Whenever the board determines that an operator has not complied with the provisions of this chapter, the board may notify the operator of such noncompliance and may, by private conference, conciliation, and persuasion, endeavor to remedy such violation. In the event of a violation referred to in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, the board may proceed without an administrative action, hearing or decision to exercise the remedies set forth in said subsections. Additionally, no administrative action, hearing or decision shall be required from the Idaho board of environmental quality prior to the board proceeding under subsections (d) and (e) of this section. In the event of the failure of any conference, conciliation and persuasion to remedy any alleged violation, the board may cause to have issued and served upon the operator alleged to be committing such violation a formal complaint that shall specify the provisions of this chapter that the operator allegedly is violating and a statement of the manner in and the extent to which said operator is alleged to be violating the provisions of this chapter. Such complaint may be served by certified mail, and a return receipt signed by the operator, an officer of a corporate operator, or the designated agent of the operator shall constitute service. The operator shall answer the complaint and request a hearing before a designated hearing officer within thirty (30) days from receipt of the complaint if matters asserted in the complaint are disputed. If the operator fails to answer the complaint and request a hearing, the matters asserted in the complaint shall be deemed admitted by the operator, and the board may proceed to cancel the reclamation or permanent closure plan and forfeit the financial assurance in the amount necessary to reclaim affected lands or complete the permanent closure activities. Upon request for a hearing by an operator, the board shall schedule a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the board at a time not less than thirty (30) days after the date the operator requests a hearing. The board shall issue subpoenas at the request of the director of the department of lands and at the request of the charged operator, and the matter shall be otherwise handled and conducted in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The hearing officer shall, pursuant to said hearing, enter an order in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, which, if adverse to the operator, shall designate a time period within which corrective action should be taken. The time period designated shall be long enough to allow the operator, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, to rectify any failure to comply designated in said order. In the event that the operator takes such action as is necessary to comply with the order within the time period designated in said order, no further action shall be taken by the board to compel performance under the chapter.

Upon request of the board, the attorney general shall institute proceedings to have the financial assurance of an operator forfeited for the violation by the operator of an order entered pursuant to this section.

The forfeiture of such financial assurance shall fully satisfy all obligations of the operator to reclaim the affected land or complete permanent closure activities under the provisions of this chapter. If the violation involves an operator that has not furnished financial assurance required by this chapter, or an operator that is not required to furnish financial assurance pursuant to this chapter, or an operator who violates this chapter by performing an act not included in the original approved reclamation plan or the original approved permanent closure plan, and such departure from the plan is not subsequently approved, such operator shall be subject to a civil penalty for his failure to comply with such order in the amount determined by the board to be the anticipated cost of reasonable reclamation of affected lands or permanent closure of the cyanidation facility. Nothing in this subsection shall relieve the operator of any obligation, including the obligation to complete closure requirements, pursuant to a permit issued by the department of environmental quality under section 39-118A, Idaho Code, or limit that department’s authority to require compliance with such permit requirements.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the board may commence an action without financial assurance or undertaking, in the name of the state of Idaho, to enjoin any operator who is conducting operations without an approved plan required by section 47-1506, Idaho Code, or without the financial assurance required by this chapter. The court, or a judge thereof at chambers, if satisfied from the complaint or by affidavits that such acts have been or are being committed, shall issue a temporary restraining order without notice or bond, enjoining the defendant, his agents, and employees from conducting such operations without said plan or bond. Upon a showing of good cause therefor, the temporary restraining order may require the defendant to perform reclamation of the mined area in conformity with sections 47-1509 and 47-1510, Idaho Code, or to complete permanent closure activities, pending final disposition of the action. The action shall then proceed as in other cases for injunctions. If it is established at trial that the defendant has operated without an approved plan or financial assurance, the court shall enter, in addition to any other order, a decree enjoining the defendant, his agents and employees from thereafter conducting such activities or similar actions in violation of this chapter. The board may, in conjunction with its injunctive procedures, proceed in the same or in a separate action to recover from an operator who is conducting mining or exploration operations or operating a cyanidation facility without the required plan or financial assurance, the cost of performing the reclamation activities required by sections 47-1509 and 47-1510, Idaho Code, or the cost of permanent closure activities from any such operator who has not provided financial assurance to cover the cost of the required activities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board may, without bond or undertaking and without any administrative action, hearing or decision, commence an action in the name of the state of Idaho (1) to enjoin a permitted mining operation or cyanidation facility when, under an existing approved plan, an operator violates the terms of the plan and where immediate and irreparable injury, loss or damage may result to the state, and (2) to recover the penalties and to collect civil damages provided for by law.

In addition to the procedures set forth in subsections (a), (d) and (e) of this section, and in addition to the civil penalty provided in subsection (c) of this section, any operator who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant thereto, or who fails to perform the duties imposed by these provisions, or who violates any determination or order promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be liable to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day during which such violation continues, and in addition may be enjoined from continuing such violation. Such penalties shall be recoverable in an action brought in the name of the state of Idaho by the attorney general in the district court for the county where the violation, or some part thereof, occurs, or in the district court for the county wherein the defendant resides.

All sums recovered related to the reclamation provisions of this chapter shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to the mining reclamation fund, which is hereby created, to be used to reclaim affected lands and to administer the reclamation provisions of this chapter.

All sums recovered related to the cyanidation facility closure provisions of this chapter shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to the cyanidation facility closure fund, which is hereby created. Moneys in the fund may be expended pursuant to appropriation and used to complete permanent closure activities and to administer the permanent closure provisions of this chapter.

Any person who willfully and knowingly falsifies any records, information, plans, specifications, or other data required by the board or willfully fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

Reclamation plans approved by the board as of July 1, 2019, shall be deemed to be in full compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

§ 47-1514. Appeal from final order — Procedure.

Any operator dissatisfied with any final order of the board made pursuant to this chapter may, within sixty (60) days after notice of such order, obtain judicial review thereof by appealing to the district court of the state of Idaho for the county wherein the operator resides or has a place of business, or to the district court for the county in which the cyanidation facility or the land or any portions thereof affected by the order is located. Such appeal shall be perfected by filing with the clerk of such court, in duplicate, a notice of appeal, together with a complaint against the board, in duplicate, which shall recite the prior proceedings before the board or hearing officer, and shall state the grounds upon which the petitioner claims he is entitled to relief. A copy of the summons and complaint shall be delivered to the board or such person or persons as the board may designate to receive service of process. The clerk of the court shall immediately forward a copy of the notice of appeal and complaint to the board, which shall forthwith prepare, certify and file in said court, a true copy of any decision, findings of fact, conclusions or order, together with any pleadings upon which the case was heard and submitted to the board or hearing officer, and shall, upon order of the court, provide transcripts of any record, including all exhibits and testimony of any proceedings in said matter before the board or any of its subordinates. Such suit in the district court shall be a trial de novo and shall proceed in all respects like other civil suits, including, but not limited to, the rights of appeal to the supreme court of the state of Idaho.

When the board finds that justice so requires, it may postpone the effective date of a final order made, pending judicial review. The reviewing court, including the court to which a case may be taken on appeal, may issue all necessary and appropriate orders to postpone the effective date of any final order pending conclusion of the review proceedings.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter concerning administrative or judicial proceedings, whenever the board determines that an operator has not complied with the provisions of this chapter, the board may file a civil action in the district court for the county wherein the violation, or some part thereof, occurs, or in the district court for the county wherein the defendant resides. The board may request the court to issue an appropriate order to remedy the violation. The right of appeal to the supreme court of the state of Idaho shall be available.

§ 47-1515. Information.

Any information supplied by an operator to the board, the director, or the department of lands, and designated by such operator as confidential, shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

§ 47-1516. Deposit of forfeitures and damages.

All forfeitures and civil damages collected under the provisions of this act shall be deposited with the state treasurer in a special fund to be used by the board for mined land reclamation purposes.

§ 47-1517. Conduct of activities.

An operator shall conduct all exploration and mining operations in accordance with all applicable statutes and regulations pertaining to water use and mining safety applicable to exploration and mining operations.

An operator desiring to operate a cyanidation facility within the state of Idaho shall conduct all related activities in accordance with all applicable statutes and rules related to cyanidation including, but not limited to, section 39-118A, Idaho Code.

§ 47-1518. Effective date — Application of chapter.

The reclamation provisions of this chapter shall be in full force and effect on and after May 31, 1971. A surface mine operator shall not be required to perform the reclamation activities referred to in this chapter as to any surface mining operations performed prior to May 31, 1972, and, further, shall not be required to perform such reclamation activities as to any pit or overburden pile as it exists prior to May 31, 1972.

The cyanidation provisions of this chapter shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2005. A cyanidation facility with an existing permit approved by the department of environmental quality under section 39-118A, Idaho Code, as of July 1, 2005, shall be deemed to be in full compliance with the requirements of this chapter. If there is a material modification or a material expansion of a cyanidation facility after July 1, 2005, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the modification or expansion. Provided however, that reclamation or closure-related activities at a facility with an existing cyanidation permit that did not actively add cyanide after January 1, 2005, shall not be considered to be material modifications or a material expansion of the facility.

An underground mine operator shall not be subject to this chapter for affected land disturbed by underground mine operations prior to July 1, 2019. If there is a significant change to affected land at an underground mining operation after July 1, 2019, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the significant change.

The financial assurance and post-closure provisions of this chapter amended in 2019 shall be in force and effect on or after July 1, 2019. Provided that the financial assurance and post-closure provisions of this chapter amended in 2019 shall not apply to:

Mining operations currently permitted or authorized to commence operations prior to July 1, 2019; or

Any mining operation that has permanently ceased operations prior to July 1, 2019.

For mining operations that have submitted maps and plans to state or federal agencies as required by section 47-1506, Idaho Code, but such operations have not been approved prior to July 1, 2019, such operations shall have one (1) year after operation approval to submit plans and financial assurance required by the financial assurance and post-closure provisions of this chapter as amended in 2019.

The board shall promulgate temporary rules by August 1, 2019, to implement the 2019 amendments to this chapter.

§ 47-1519. Application of chapter to mineral extraction for public highway purposes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the bonding provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any surface mining operations conducted by a public or governmental agency for maintenance, repair, or construction of a public highway. Surface mining operations conducted by a public or governmental agency for maintenance, repair, or construction of a public highway which disturb two (2) or more acres shall comply with the provisions of section 47-1506, Idaho Code, as though all minerals were mined for the purpose of immediate or ultimate sale. Surface mining operations conducted by a public or governmental agency for maintenance, repair or construction of a public highway which disturb less than two (2) acres are exempt from the provisions of section 47-1506, Idaho Code. The extraction of minerals from within the right-of-way of a public highway by a public or governmental agency for maintenance, repair or construction of a public highway shall not be deemed surface mining operations under this chapter, provided that the affected land is an integral part of the public highway.